Illinois, session 104th, SB1426.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Weather Modification Act. 6    Section 5. Prohibition on weather modification. Any form 7of weather modification shall not be allowed in this State, 8including the seeding of clouds by plane or ground. As used in 9this Section, "seeding" means a type of weather modification 10that aims to change the amount or type of precipitation that 11falls from clouds. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.